Massachusetts, session 194th, S1689.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 64 of the Acts of 2023 is hereby amended by inserting at the end of section 2 the 
following subsection:- 
"(d) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, section 87A of chapter 
127 shall not apply to an individual committed to a state correctional facility, state prison, or 
county correctional facility who has been found guilty of any of the following crimes: rape, rape 
of a child, first degree murder, second degree murder, attempted murder, sexual assault, assault 
and battery on second offense, assault and battery with dangerous weapon, arson, stalking, and 
armed robbery.”